Mississippi, session 2026, HB815.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The State Personnel Board shall adjust the Colonel Guy Groff/Neville Kenning Variable Compensation Plan in a manner that will effectuate an increase in the annual compensation of each state service employee by an amount of three precent (3%) over and above that sum that is the annual compensation of the employee in effect on June 30, 2026, to be effective on July 1, 2026.  Part-time state employees shall receive a pro rate share of a three percent (3%) salary increase based on the amount of time worked per week. (2)  If the increase in compensation provided for in this section would cause any employee's compensation to be in excess of the compensation of the executive head of the state agency or department in which he or she is employed, then that employee's compensation shall be increased only to the extent that the employee's salary will be equal in amount to the compensation of the executive head. (3)  If any state employee is unable to receive the full amount of the salary increase provided for in this section because to award the entire allowable increase would cause that employee's base salary to exceed the end step of his or her particular job classification, the State Personnel Board shall amend the Variable Compensation Plan by increasing the end step of that particular job classification.  The increase shall be in an amount necessary to enable all employees in that particular job classification to be eligible to receive the full salary increase to which they are entitled under this section. SECTION 2. The Legislature shall appropriate the funds necessary to provide for the increases in compensation provided for in this act. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.